test/src/gt-desc-yamls/nouns_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - vyr - ok : # singular declensions for vyras
    vyr+N+Sg+Nom: vyras 
    vyr+N+Sg+Gen: vyro 
    vyr+N+Sg+Dat: vyrui
    vyr+N+Sg+Acc: vyrą
    vyr+N+Sg+Ins: vyru
    vyr+N+Sg+Loc: vyre
    vyr+N+Pl+Nom: vyrai 
    vyr+N+Pl+Gen: vyrų
    vyr+N+Pl+Dat: vyrams
    vyr+N+Pl+Acc: vyrus
    vyr+N+Pl+Ins: vyrais
    vyr+N+Pl+Loc: vyruose
